South Dakota, session 2026, SB241.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-12A:
Prior to December first of each year, the department shall provide a report to each
Indian tribe tribal government that has entered into a tax collection agreement under the
provisions of this chapter and chapter 1-24, estimating the amount of tax collected under
a tax collection agreement from January first through December thirty-first of the prior
year for each tax included in § 10-12A-4, within the area covered by the tax collection
agreement.
The annual report must distinguish between tax revenue collected from remote
sellers and nonremote sellers.
Prior to December 1, 2026, the department shall provide the report required by
this section for the years 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, and 2025.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-12A:
Prior to December first of each year, the department shall provide a report to each
Indian tribe tribal government that has not entered into a tax collection agreement, and
to Indian tribes with citizens residing on tribal lands outside the tax collection agreement
areas under the provisions of this chapter and chapter 1-24, estimating, based on the
proportion of a county's population that consists of who are members of an Indian tribe
according to the latest federal census, the amount of tax collected under a tax collection
agreement from January first through December thirty-first of the prior year from tribal
members for each tax included in § 10-12A-4 within the boundaries of the following
counties:
(1) Bennett County;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

241A 2 241
(2) Buffalo County;
(3) Charles Mix County;
(4) Corson County;
(5) Dewey County;
(6) Hughes County;
(7) Hyde County;
(8) Grant County;
(9) Gregory County;
(10) Jackson County;
(11) Lyman County;
(12) Marshall County;
(13) Mellette County;
(14) Moody County;
(15) Oglala Lakota County;
(16) Roberts County;
(17) Stanley County;
(18) Todd County;
(19) Tripp County; and
(20) Ziebach County.
The annual report must distinguish between tax revenue collected from remote
sellers and nonremote sellers.
Prior to December 1, 2026, the department shall provide the reports required by
this section for the years 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, and 2025.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-12A:
If the department does not have the information necessary to furnish a report to
an Indian tribe a tribal government pursuant to sections 1 and 2 of this Act, the
department must develop and maintain a methodology to collect and report the
information.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.